Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 7. School Health

§ 35-1-701.
Joint committee created.

A joint committee on school health composed of the state department of education and the state department of health is hereby created and established.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 193, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-83; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

§ 35-1-702.
Duties of joint committee; limitation upon application of policies.

It shall be the duty of the joint committee on school health to prescribe uniform policies regarding the medical services, sanitary environment and health instruction of the school children. Provided that any policies prescribed relating to medical treatment or physical examination shall not be applicable to any student whose parent or guardian in writing objects to such regulation on religious grounds. Such objection shall not exempt the student from the quarantine laws of the state, nor prohibit an examination for infectious or contagious diseases.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 193, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-84.

Cross references. —

As to exceptions generally with reference to religion in connection with health laws, see §

35-1-201

.